Utah statutes.
23-19-10.   Duplicate license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration.

If an unexpired license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration issued under the provisions of this code is destroyed, lost, or stolen, the Division of Wildlife Resources and its authorized license agents may issue a duplicate license, permit, tag, or certificate of registration in accordance with the rules set and fees determined by the Wildlife Board.



Amended by Chapter 117, 2005 General Session

